West Virginia, session 2026, HB4329.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 10. Authorization for Department of commerce to promulgate legislative rules. §64- 10 - 1. Division of Natural Resources. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 25, 2025, authorized under the authority of §20-7-23 of this code, relating to the Division of Natural Resources (special boating, 58 CSR 26), is authorized.